District of Columbia statutes.
22-3054

Second degree unlawful publication.

(a)

It shall be unlawful in the District of Columbia for a person to knowingly publish one or more sexual images of another identified or identifiable person obtained from a third party or other source when:

(1)

The person depicted did not consent to the disclosure or publication of the sexual image; and

(2)

The person published the sexual image with conscious disregard that the sexual image was obtained as a result of a previous disclosure or publication of the sexual image made with an intent to harm the person depicted or to receive financial gain.

(b)

A person who violates this section shall be guilty of a misdemeanor and, upon conviction, shall be fined not more than the amount set forth in § 22-3571.01, imprisoned for not more than 180 days, or both.

History

May 7, 2015, D.C. Law 20-275, § 5, 62 DCR 16